Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1419
Commission; chairperson; designated by Governor.

The chairperson of the commission shall be designated by the Governor to serve at the pleasure of the Governor. The chairperson shall be the chief executive officer of the commission but may delegate such of his or her duties to the executive director as may be authorized by the commission.

Laws 1969, c. 774, § 5, p. 2933;

Laws 1994, LB 971, § 13.